nl: Ovenaccessoires inbegrepen: Braadpan; Rotisserie-opzetstuk; Draadrek; Andere
it: Accessori per il forno inclusi: Teglia per arrosto; Accessorio per girarrosto; Griglia; Altro
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm lò nướng: Chảo quay; Phụ kiện xiên quay; Vỉ dây thép; Khác
hu: Mellékelt sütőtartozékok: Serpenyő; Grillsütőtartozék; Borállvány; Egyéb
fi: Mukana uunitarvikkeet: Paistovuoka; Grillaustarvike; Johtoteline; Muu
sv: Ugnstillbehör ingår: Stekfat; Rotisserietillbehör; Vinställ; Övrigt
es: Accesorios para horno incluidos: Bandeja para hornear; Accesorio para asador; Estante de alambre; Otros
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za pečico: Pekač za pečenje; Rotisserie nastavek; Rešetka; Drugo
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเตาอบที่รวมอยู่: ถาดปิ้งย่าง; อุปกรณ์ยึดสำหรับย่างเนื้อสัตว์; ชั้นวางลวด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva rúry: Panvica na pečenie; Grilovací ražeň; Drôtený stojan; Iné
cs: Obsažené příslušenství do trouby: Pánev na pečení; Nástavec k rožni; Drátěný stojan; Jiné
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за фурна: Тиган за печене; Приставка за ротисерия; Решетка; Други
ko: 오븐 액세서리 포함: 구이용 팬; 로티세리 부착물; 철제 선반; 기타
de: Inbegriffenes Ofenzubehör: Bräter; Rotisserie-Aufsatz; Gitterrost; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 包括烤箱配件: 煎鍋; 烤肉架附件; 電線架; 其他
fr: Accessoires de four inclus: Rôtissoire; Accessoires pour rôtissoire; Grille; Autre
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys orkaitės priedai: Skrudinimo keptuvė; Kepimo iešmas; Grotelės; Kita
nb: Ovnstilbehør inkludert: Langpanner; Rotisseri-tilbehør; Trådstativ; Annet
pt-PT: Acessórios de forno incluídos: Assadeira; Acessório para churrasqueira; Grelha; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ φούρνου: Πιατέλα ψησίματος; Εξάρτημα ψησταριάς; Ράφι από σύρμα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za pećnicu: Pleh za pečenje s rešetkom; Dodatak za pečenje na ražnju; Žičani stalak; Ostalo
ru: Принадлежности для духовки в комплекте: Противень для запекания; Насадка для вертела; Решетка; Другое
en: Oven accessories included: Roasting pan; Rotisserie attachment; Wire rack; Other
pl: W zestawie akcesoria do piekarnika: Blacha do pieczenia; Przystawka do rożna; Stojak na przewody; Inne
da: Ovntilbehør medfølger: Bradepande; Rotisserie-udstyr; Trådhylde; Andet
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru cuptor incluse: Tavă pentru friptură; Accesoriu pentru rotitor; Raft de sârmă; Altele
tr: Fırın aksesuarları dahil: Kızartma tavası; Çevirme aparatı; Tel raf; Diğer
ja: オーブン関連の付属品: ローストパン; ロティサリーアタッチメント; ワイヤーラック; その他
zh-CN: 包括烤箱配件: 烤盘; 烤肉架附件; 电线架; 其他
pt-BR: Acessórios de forno incluídos: Assadeira; Acessórios para churrasqueira; Grelha; Outro